Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.660

Exchange of intimate images by minors—Findings—Work group.

(1) The legislature finds that exchange of intimate images by minors is increasingly common, and that such actions may lead to harm and long-term consequences. The legislature intends to develop age-appropriate prevention and interventions to prevent harm and to hold accountable youth who harm others through exchange of intimate images.

(2) The Washington coalition of sexual assault programs, in consultation with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the Washington association for the treatment of sexual abusers, the department of children, youth, and families, the department of social and health services, the juvenile court administrators, the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, representatives from public defense, youth representatives, and other relevant stakeholders, shall convene a work group to make recommendations to the legislature regarding age-appropriate prevention and intervention strategies to address potential harms caused by exchange of intimate images by minors.

(3) By December 1, 2019, the work group shall make a report to the legislature identifying education, prevention, and other responses to the harms that may be associated with exchange of intimate images by minors.

[ 2019 c 128 s 2.]

NOTES:

Short title—2019 c 128: "This act may be known and cited as the responsible teen communications act." [ 2019 c 128 s 1.]